Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 48

Arkansas Adult Probation Commission

12-48-101 — 12-48-106. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 549, § 9. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

12-48-101. Acts 1983, No. 151, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1302.

12-48-103. Acts 1983, No. 151, §§ 9-17; 1985, No. 483, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1307.

12-48-105. Acts 1983, No. 151, § 18; 1985, No. 483, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1308.

Acts 1993, No. 549, § 7 provided that the Board of Correction and Community Punishment shall succeed to all powers, functions, and duties formerly vested in the State Penitentiary Board and Arkansas Adult Probation Commission.

12-48-102. Acts 1983, No. 151, §§ 1, 3, 4, 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1301, 42-1303 — 42-1305.

12-48-104. Acts 1983, No. 151, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1306.

12-48-106. Acts 1983, No. 151, §§ 19-24; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1309.